Nebraska, session 109, LB306A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB306A LB306A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $2,000 from the Auditor
of Public Accounts Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $5,000 from the
Auditor of Public Accounts Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Auditor of
Public Accounts, for Program 525, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 306, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session,
2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $1,900 for
FY2025-26 or $4,700 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $569,833 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $410,981 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to the State Department of Education, for Program 25, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 306, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $304,566
for FY2025-26 or $226,122 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated (1) $250,000 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $250,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to the State Department of Education, for Program 158, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 306, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$250,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $250,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated (1) $192,800 from the General
-2-

LB306A LB306A
2025 2025
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $195,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, for Program 781,
to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 306, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
-3-